hfst-tools/hfst-lexc/test/divvun-sme/sme-lex.txt
LEXICON DeverbalVerbsDIEHTI
 +Der1+Der/st+V:»W4st MUITALStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:»W5stalla%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»W5stadda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:»W7stalla%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»W7stadda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»W4stahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/asti+V:»W4stas'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:»W4steas'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/l+V:»l MUITALStem ;
 +Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»W6ladda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»X2ladda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»lahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/asti+V:»las'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:»leas'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V:»X4h MUITALStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:»Q4halla%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»Q4hadda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»X4hahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/asti+V:»X4has'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:»X4heas'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der2+Der/stuvva+V:»W7stuvva%> BOAHTIINCH ;
 +Der1+Der2+Der/halla+V:»X6halla%> BOAHTIINCH ;

LEXICON DeverbalVerbsARVI
 +Der1+Der/st+V:»W4st COASKKITCnj ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:»W5stalla%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»W5stadda%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:»W7stalla%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»W7stadda%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/asti+V:»W4stas'ti%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:»W4steas'ti%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der1+Der/l+V:»l COASKKITCnj ;
 +Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»W6ladda%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»X2ladda%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/asti+V:»las'ti%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der1+Der/l+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:»leas'ti%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der1+Der2+Der/stuvva+V:»W7stuvva%> ARVICnj ;


LEXICON DeverbalVerbsDOHPPE
 +Der1+Der/st+V:»st MUITALStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:»stalla%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»stadda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»stahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/asti+V:»stas'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:»steas'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V:»h MUITALStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:»halla%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»hadda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»hahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/asti+V:»has'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:»heas'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der2+Der/stuvva+V:»stuvva%> BOAHTIINCH ;
 +Der1+Der2+Der/halla+V:»halla%> BOAHTIINCH ;
 +Der1+Der/d+V:»d MUITALStem ;

LEXICON DeverbalVerbsGILLE
 +Der1+Der/st+V:»st ALISTStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:»stalla%> BOAHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»stadda%> BOAHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»stahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/asti+V:»stas'ti%> BOAHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:»steas'ti%> BOAHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V:»h MUITALStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:»halla%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»hadda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»hahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/asti+V:»has'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der/h+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:»heas'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der1+Der2+Der/stuvva+V:»stuvva%> BOAHTIINCH ;
 +Der1+Der/d+V:»d ALISTStem ;

LEXICON DeverbalVerbsBORGE
 +Der1+Der/st+V:»st COASKKITCnj ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/alla+V:»stalla%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/adda+V:»stadda%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/asti+V:»stas'ti%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der1+Der/st+V+Der2+Der/easti+V:»steas'ti%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der1+Der2+Der/stuvva+V:»stuvva%> ARVICnj ;



LEXICON DeverbalVerbsMUITAL
 +Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»ahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +Der2+Der/alla+V:»X1alla%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der2+Der/adda+V:»X1adda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der2+Der/asti+V:»as'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der2+Der/easti+V:»eas'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;

LEXICON DeverbalVerbsVUORDIL
 +Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»ahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +Der2+Der/adda+V:»X1adda%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der2+Der/asti+V:»as'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der2+Der/easti+V:»eas'ti%> DIEHTALADDAStem ;


LEXICON DeverbalVerbsALIST
 +Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»ahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +Der2+Der/alla+V:»X1alla%> BOAHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der2+Der/adda+V:»X1adda%> BOAHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der2+Der/asti+V:»as'ti%> BOAHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der2+Der/easti+V:»eas'ti%> BOAHTALADDAStem ;

LEXICON DeverbalVerbsSUOTNJAL
 +Der2+Der/ahtti+V+TV:»ahtti%> DIEHTIStem ;
 +Der2+Der/adda+V:»X1adda%> BOAHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der2+Der/asti+V:»as'ti%> BOAHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der2+Der/easti+V:»eas'ti%> BOAHTALADDAStem ;

LEXICON DeverbalVerbsBOTNJAS
 +Der2+Der/alla+V:»X1alla%> BOAHTALADDAStem ;
 +Der2+Der/adda+V:»X1adda%> BOAHTALADDAStem ;

LEXICON DeverbalVerbsLASSAN
 +Der2+Der/adda+V:»X1adda%> BOAHTALADDAStem ;

LEXICON DeverbalVerbsCOASKKIT
 +Der2+Der/alla+V:»X1alla%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der2+Der/adda+V:»X1adda%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der2+Der/asti+V:»as'ti%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der2+Der/easti+V:»eas'ti%> ARVICnj ;

LEXICON DeverbalVerbsARVIL
 +Der2+Der/adda+V:»X1adda%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der2+Der/asti+V:»as'ti%> ARVICnj ;
 +Der2+Der/easti+V:»eas'ti%> ARVICnj ;






! -------
! Clitics
! -------

LEXICON K
 ENDLEX ;
 +Qst:#go ENDLEX ;  	  !^C^ !I removed the Circ symbol from these two, as they are common.
 +Foc/naj+Qst:#naigo ENDLEX ;  !^C^
 +Qst+Foc/son:#goson ENDLEX ;  !^C^
 +Foc/ge:#ge ENDLEX ;	 !^C^ !Alternatively, the K lexicon may be done at PL as a compound lexicon
 +Foc/gen:#gen ENDLEX ;  !^C^ ! Also, the symbol should be ^L^ (large), rather than ^-C-^
 +Foc/ges:#ges ENDLEX ;  !^C^ ! Attested for 'muges'. Others?
 +Foc/gis:#gis ENDLEX ;  !^C^ ! Means same as ges and is maybe more common
 +Foc/naj:#nai ENDLEX ;	 !^C^
 +Foc/ba:#ba ENDLEX ;    !^C^
 +Foc/ban:#ban ENDLEX ;  !^C^
 +Foc/be:#be ENDLEX ;    !^C^
 +Foc/hal:#hal ENDLEX ;  !^C^  ! XXX Is this required?
 +Foc/han:#han ENDLEX ;  !^C^
 +Foc/bat:#bat ENDLEX ;  !^C^
 +Foc/son:#son ENDLEX ;  !^C^  ! makkárson

LEXICON K-son
! K ;
 +Foc/son:#son ENDLEX ; !^C^
 +Foc/hal:#hal ENDLEX ;  !^C^  ! XXX Is this required?
 +Foc/bat:#bat ENDLEX ;  !^C^
 ENDLEX ;
! This is a Continuation Class for Interrogative Pronouns and Adverbs like
! gii(son), gosa(son) etc.. These have now been added to the lexicon(s).
! I tentatively direct it to K, so that they have #son plus the K clitics.
!outcommented K, added bat and hal (TO), makkárhal, makkárbat

LEXICON ENDLEX
 @D.NeedNoun.ON@ # ;
! @D.Need3Part.ON@ # ; !3part
! This ENDLEX business in order to remove illegal compounds.
